Utah statutes.
63H-2-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Authority" means the Utah Generated Renewable Energy Electricity Network Authority created in Section 63H-2-201.

(2)  "Authority bond" means a bond issued by the authority in accordance with Part 4, Bonding.

(3)  "Board" means the board created under Section 63H-2-202.

(4)  "Community" means the county, city, or town in which is located a qualifying transmission project financed by an authority bond.

(5)  "Electric interlocal entity" means an interlocal entity defined in Section 11-13-103.

(6)  "Independent state agency" is as defined in Section 63E-1-102.

(7)  "Public entity" means:

(a)  the United States or an agency of the United States;

(b)  the state or an agency of the state;

(c)  a political subdivision of the state or an agency of a political subdivision of the state;

(d)  another state or an agency of that state; or

(e)  a political subdivision of another state or an agency of that political subdivision.

(8)  "Qualifying transmission project" means a transmission project approved by the board in accordance with Part 3, Qualifying Transmission Projects.

(9)  "Record" means information that is:

(a)  inscribed on a tangible medium; or

(b) (i)  stored in an electronic or other medium; and

(ii)  retrievable in perceivable form.

(10)  "Related facility" means a facility related to the effective operation of a transmission line although the facility is not directly a part of a transmission line, including:

(a)  a substation; or

(b)  an access road.

(11)  "Renewable energy source" is as defined in Section 10-19-102.

(12)  "Transmission project" means a project that is designed to:

(a)  increase capacity for transmission of electric power or energy to an electric load:

(i)   within this state; or

(ii)  outside of the state; or

(b)  otherwise increase the capability of an existing electric transmission line or related facility to transmit electric power and energy from a renewable energy source to an electric load:

(i)  within this state; or

(ii)  outside of the state.

(13)  "Wholesale electrical cooperative" is as defined in Section 54-2-1.

